North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 5. Administration.
§ 153A-98.
Privacy of employee personnel records.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 132-6

or any other general law or local act concerning access to public records, personnel files of employees, former employees, or applicants for employment maintained by a county are subject to inspection and may be disclosed only as provided by this section. For purposes of this section, an employee’s personnel file consists of any information in any form gathered by the county with respect to that employee and, by way of illustration but not limitation, relating to his application, selection or nonselection, performance, promotions, demotions, transfers, suspension and other disciplinary actions, evaluation forms, leave, salary, and termination of employment. As used in this section, “employee” includes former employees of the county.

The following information with respect to each county employee is a matter of public record:

Name.

Age.

Date of original employment or appointment to the county service.

The terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the county has the written contract or a record of the oral contract in its possession.

Current position.

Title.

Current salary.

Date and amount of each increase or decrease in salary with that county.

Date and type of each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension, separation or other change in position classification with that county.

Date and general description of the reasons for each promotion with that county.

Date and type of each dismissal, suspension, or demotion for disciplinary reasons taken by the county. If the disciplinary action was a dismissal, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the county setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the dismissal.

The office to which the employee is currently assigned.

(b1)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “salary” includes pay, benefits, incentives, bonuses, and deferred and all other forms of compensation paid by the employing entity.

(b2)

The board of county commissioners shall determine in what form and by whom this information will be maintained. Any person may have access to this information for the purpose of inspection, examination, and copying, during regular business hours, subject only to such rules and regulations for the safekeeping of public records as the board of commissioners may have adopted. Any person denied access to this information may apply to the appropriate division of the General Court of Justice for an order compelling disclosure, and the court shall have jurisdiction to issue such orders.

All information contained in a county employee’s personnel file, other than the information made public by subsection (b) of this section, is confidential and shall be open to inspection only in the following instances:

The employee or his duly authorized agent may examine all portions of his personnel file except (i) letters of reference solicited prior to employment, and (ii) information concerning a medical disability, mental or physical, that a prudent physician would not divulge to his patient.

A licensed physician designated in writing by the employee may examine the employee’s medical record.

A county employee having supervisory authority over the employee may examine all material in the employee’s personnel file.

By order of a court of competent jurisdiction, any person may examine such portion of an employee’s personnel file as may be ordered by the court.

An official of an agency of the State or federal government, or any political subdivision of the State, may inspect any portion of a personnel file when such inspection is deemed by the official having custody of such records to be inspected to be necessary and essential to the pursuance of a proper function of the inspecting agency, but no information shall be divulged for the purpose of assisting in a criminal prosecution of the employee, or for the purpose of assisting in an investigation of the employee’s tax liability. However, the official having custody of such records may release the name, address, and telephone number from a personnel file for the purpose of assisting in a criminal investigation.

An employee may sign a written release, to be placed with his personnel file, that permits the person with custody of the file to provide, either in person, by telephone, or by mail, information specified in the release to prospective employers, educational institutions, or other persons specified in the release.

The county manager, with concurrence of the board of county commissioners, or, in counties not having a manager, the board of county commissioners may inform any person of the employment or nonemployment, promotion, demotion, suspension or other disciplinary action, reinstatement, transfer, or termination of a county employee and the reasons for that personnel action. Before releasing the information, the manager or board shall determine in writing that the release is essential to maintaining public confidence in the administration of county services or to maintaining the level and quality of county services. This written determination shall be retained in the office of the manager or the county clerk, is a record available for public inspection and shall become part of the employee’s personnel file.

(c1)

Even if considered part of an employee’s personnel file, the following information need not be disclosed to an employee nor to any other person:

(1)

Testing or examination material used solely to determine individual qualifications for appointment, employment, or promotion in the county’s service, when disclosure would compromise the objectivity or the fairness of the testing or examination process.

(2)

Investigative reports or memoranda and other information concerning the investigation of possible criminal actions of an employee, until the investigation is completed and no criminal action taken, or until the criminal action is concluded.

(3)

Information that might identify an undercover law enforcement officer or a law enforcement informer.

(4)

Notes, preliminary drafts and internal communications concerning an employee. In the event such materials are used for any official personnel decision, then the employee or his duly authorized agent shall have a right to inspect such materials.

(c2)

The board of county commissioners may permit access, subject to limitations they may impose, to selected personnel files by a professional representative of a training, research, or academic institution if that person certifies that he will not release information identifying the employees whose files are opened and that the information will be used solely for statistical, research, or teaching purposes. This certification shall be retained by the county as long as each personnel file so examined is retained.

(c3)

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-108, s. 2(g), effective July 22, 2016.

(c4)

Even if considered part of an employee’s personnel file, the following information regarding any sworn law enforcement officer shall not be disclosed to an employee or any other person, unless disclosed in accordance with

G.S. 132-1.4

, or in accordance with

G.S. 132-1.10

, or for the personal safety of that sworn law enforcement officer or any other person residing in the same residence:

(1)

Information that might identify the residence of a sworn law enforcement officer.

(2)

Emergency contact information.

(3)

Any identifying information as defined in

G.S. 14-113.20

.

(c5)

Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, information shall be provided to the State Board of Elections from employee personnel records as provided in

G.S. 163-22

.

The board of commissioners of a county that maintains personnel files containing information other than the information mentioned in subsection (b) of this section shall establish procedures whereby an employee who objects to material in his file on grounds that it is inaccurate or misleading may seek to have the material removed from the file or may place in the file a statement relating to the material.

A public official or employee who knowingly, willfully, and with malice permits any person to have access to information contained in a personnel file, except as is permitted by this section, is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall only be fined an amount not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

Any person, not specifically authorized by this section to have access to a personnel file designated as confidential, who shall knowingly and willfully examine in its official filing place, remove or copy any portion of a confidential personnel file shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall only be fined in the discretion of the court but not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

1975, c. 701, s. 1; 1981, c. 926, ss. 1, 5-8; 1993, c. 539, ss. 1059, 1060; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2007-508, s. 6; 2008-194, s. 11(d); 2010-169, s. 18(e); 2015-225, s. 1; 2016-108, s. 2(g); 2018-13, s. 3.2(b); 2018-146, s. 6.1.

§ 153A-99.
County employee political activity.

Purpose.— The purpose of this section is to ensure that county employees are not subjected to political or partisan coercion while performing their job duties, to ensure that employees are not restricted from political activities while off duty, and to ensure that public funds are not used for political or partisan activities.It is not the purpose of this section to allow infringement upon the rights of employees to engage in free speech and free association. Every county employee has a civic responsibility to support good government by every available means and in every appropriate manner. Employees shall not be restricted from affiliating with civic organizations of a partisan or political nature, nor shall employees, while off duty, be restricted from attending political meetings, or advocating and supporting the principles or policies of civic or political organizations, or supporting partisan or nonpartisan candidates of their choice in accordance with the Constitution and laws of the State and the Constitution and laws of the United States of America.

Definitions.— For the purposes of this section:

“County employee” or “employee” means any person employed by a county or any department or program thereof that is supported, in whole or in part, by county funds;

“On duty” means that time period when an employee is engaged in the duties of his or her employment; and

“Workplace” means any place where an employee engages in his or her job duties.

No employee while on duty or in the workplace may:

Use his or her official authority or influence for the purpose of interfering with or affecting the result of an election or nomination for political office; or

Coerce, solicit, or compel contributions for political or partisan purposes by another employee.

No employee may be required as a duty or condition of employment, promotion, or tenure of office to contribute funds for political or partisan purposes.

No employee may use county funds, supplies, or equipment for partisan purposes, or for political purposes except where such political uses are otherwise permitted by law.

To the extent that this section conflicts with the provisions of any local act, local ordinance, resolution, or policy, this section prevails to the extent of the conflict.

History.

1991, c. 619, s. 1; 1993, c. 298, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Political Patronage and North Carolina Law: Is Political Conformity With the Sheriff a Permissible Job Requirement for Deputies?,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1743 (2001).

§ 153A-99.1.
County verification of employee work authorization.

Counties Must Use E-Verify. — Each county shall register and participate in E-Verify to verify the work authorization of new employees hired to work in the United States.

E-Verify Defined. — As used in this section, the term “E-Verify” means the federal E-Verify program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security and other federal agencies, or any successor or equivalent program used to verify the work authorization of newly hired employees pursuant to federal law.

Nondiscrimination. — This section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion, gender, ethnicity, or national origin.

History.

2011-263, s. 4.

§ 153A-100.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Board of Commissioners and Other Officers, Boards, Departments, and Agencies of the County.

§ 153A-101.
Board of commissioners to direct fiscal policy of the county.

The board of commissioners has and shall exercise the responsibility of developing and directing the fiscal policy of the county government under the provisions and procedures of the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.

History.

1777, c. 129, s. 4, P.R; R.C., c. 28, s. 16; Code, s. 753; Rev., s. 1379; C.S., s. 1325; 1927, c. 91, s. 11; 1953, c. 973, s. 2; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-102.
Commissioners to fix fees.

The board of commissioners may fix the fees and commissions charged by county officers and employees for performing services or duties permitted or required by law. The board may not, however, fix fees in the General Court of Justice or modify the fees of the register of deeds prescribed by

G.S. 161-10

or the fees of the board of elections prescribed by

G.S. 163-107

.

History.

1953, c. 1227, ss. 1-3; 1969, c. 358, s. 1; c. 1017; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “G.S. 163A-979” for “G.S. 163-107” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the reference.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A Localist Reading of Local Immigration Regulations,” see 86 N.C.L. Rev. 1619 (2008).

For article, “Public Education, Local Authority, and Democracy: The Implied Power of North Carolina Counties to Impose School Impact Fees,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 239 (2011).

§ 153A-102.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-111, s. 2.6(a), as amended by Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and Session Laws 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

History.

2009-436, s. 1; 2010-180, s. 11(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.6(a), as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

§ 153A-103.
Number of employees in offices of sheriff and register of deeds.

Subject to the limitations set forth below, the board of commissioners may fix the number of salaried employees in the offices of the sheriff and the register of deeds. In exercising the authority granted by this section, the board of commissioners is subject to the following limitations:

Each sheriff and register of deeds elected by the people has the exclusive right to hire, discharge, and supervise the employees in his office. However, the board of commissioners must approve the appointment by such an officer of a relative by blood or marriage of nearer kinship than first cousin or of a person who has been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude.

Each sheriff and register of deeds elected by the people is entitled to at least two deputies who shall be reasonably compensated by the county, provided that the register of deeds justifies to the Board of County Commissioners the necessity of the second deputy. Each deputy so appointed shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing officer.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, approval of the board of commissioners is not required for the reappointment or continued employment of a near relative of a sheriff or register of deeds who was not related to the appointing officer at the time of initial appointment.

History.

1953, c. 1227, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 358, s. 1; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1977, c. 36; 1979, c. 551; 1987, c. 362.

Legal Periodicals.

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2281 (1997).

§ 153A-104.
Reports from officers, employees, and agents of the county.

The board of commissioners may require any officer, employee, or agent of the county to make to the board, either directly or through the county manager, periodic or special reports concerning any matter connected with the officer’s, employee’s or agent’s duties. The board may require that such a report be made under oath. If a person fails or refuses to obey a reasonable order to make a report, issued pursuant to this section, the board may apply to the appropriate division of the General Court of Justice for an order requiring that its order be obeyed. The court has jurisdiction to issue these orders.

History.

1868, c. 20, s. 8; Code, s. 707; Rev., s. 1318; C.S., s. 1297; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§§ 153A-105 through 153A-110.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Clerk to the Board of Commissioners.

§ 153A-111.
Appointment; powers and duties.

The board of commissioners shall appoint or designate a clerk to the board. The board may designate the register of deeds or any other county officer or employee as clerk. The clerk shall perform any duties that may be required by law or the board of commissioners. The clerk shall serve as such at the pleasure of the board.

History.

Const., art. 7, s. 2; Code, s. 710; 1895, c. 135, s. 4; Rev., s. 1324; C.S., s. 1309; 1955, c. 247, s. 1; 1963, c. 372; 1969, c. 207; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§§ 153A-112,
153A-113.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 7. County Attorney.

§ 153A-114.
Appointment; duties.

The board of commissioners shall appoint a county attorney to serve at its pleasure and to be its legal adviser.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§§ 153A-115 through 153A-120.

Reserved for future codification purposes.